Hawaii statutes.
§329-59 Controlled substance registration
revolving fund; established. (a) There is established within the state
treasury the controlled substance registration revolving fund. The fund shall
be expended at the discretion of the director of public safety for the purpose
of:

(1) Offsetting the cost of the electronic
prescription accountability system, investigation of violations of this
chapter, the registration and control of the manufacture, distribution,
prescription, and dispensation of controlled substances and regulated chemicals
listed under section 329-61, within the State;

(2) Funding positions authorized by the legislature
by law; and

(3) Funding the narcotics enforcement division's
forensic drug laboratory facility.

(b) The fund shall consist of all moneys
derived from fees collected pursuant to sections 329-31 and 329-67 and
legislative appropriations. All fees collected pursuant to sections 329-31 and
329-67 shall be deposited in the controlled substance registration revolving
fund. [L 1996, c 268, §3; am L 1999, c 252, §6; am L 2002, c 165, §5; am L
2008, c 119, §2; am L 2013, c 177, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next